Maryland, session 2026, HB0939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
4–208.
(b) (1) Within EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, WITHIN [5] 12 calendar days after a birth occurs in an institution, or en route
to the institution, or outside an institution with an attending clinician, the administrative
head of the institution or a designee of the administrative head, or the attending clinician
or a designee of the attending clinician, shall:
(i) Prepare, on the form that the Secretary provides, a certificate of
birth;
(ii) Secure each signature that is required on the certificate;
(iii) File the certificate; and
(iv) If applicable, attach a copy of the order of the court establishing
parentage.
(2) The EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION,
THE attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or
attending clinician shall provide the date of birth and medical information that are required
on the certificate within [5] 12 calendar days after the birth.
(c) (1) Within EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, WITHIN [5] 12 calendar days after a birth occurs outside an institution without
an attending clinician, the birth shall be verified by the Secretary and a certificate of birth
shall be prepared, on the form that the Secretary provides, and filed by one of the following,
in the indicated order of priority:
(i) The attending individual.
(ii) In the absence of an attending individual, either parent of the
child.
(iii) In the absence or inability of either parent, the individual in
charge of the premises where the birth occurred.

HOUSE BILL 939 3
(d) (1) When a birth occurs on a common carrier within the United States and
the child is first removed from the carrier in this State, the birth shall be registered in this
State, and the place where the child is first removed shall be considered the place of birth.
(2) When a birth occurs on a common carrier while in international waters,
air space, or in a foreign country and the child is first removed from the carrier in this
State, the birth shall be registered in this State but the certificate shall show the actual
place of birth insofar as can be determined.
(3) The EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION,
THE certificate shall be filed within [5] 12 calendar days after the child is removed from
the carrier.
(G) A CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH MAY BE FILED WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE
BIRTH OCCURRED IF A PARENT OF THE CHILD NOTIFIES THE DIVISION OF VITAL
RECORDS IN A MANNER REQUIRED PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE THE CERTIFICATE OF
BIRTH ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE SECRETARY AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER
BIRTH, BUT NOT LATER THAN 5 DAYS AFTER THE BIRTH OCCURS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.